apertium-kmr.kmr.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABCÇDEÊFGHIÎJKLMNOPQRSŞTUÛVWXYZabcçdeêfghiîjklmnopqrsştuûvwxyzáÁàăắặâấậǎåäãąāảạæḇćčđḏðéèếệěëËėęēḗəğĞĝġĥȟḧḥḫḪíìĭïĩīıİḱḳľłṃńňṅṇŋñóòôốộöÖőõøōơớºœṗřṛśšŠșṣßťţṭúÚùŭǔůüÜűũųūŵẍýÝźžþʒʿḍ</alphabet>   
  <sdefs>     
    <sdef n="acr"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="narr"      c="Narrative"/>
    <sdef n="opt"      c="Optative"/>
    <sdef n="abbr"     c="Abbreviation"/>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>     
    <sdef n="ij"       c="Interjection"/>     
    <sdef n="np"      c="Proper noun"/>     
    <sdef n="pr"      c="Preposition"/>     
    <sdef n="post"    c="Postposition"/>    
    <sdef n="num"     c="Numeral"/>     
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun"/>     
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjective"/>     
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb"/>     
    <sdef n="preadv"     c="Preadverb"/>  
    <sdef n="det"     c="Determiner"/>     
    <sdef n="enc"     c="Enclitic"/>     
    <sdef n="ord"     c="Ordinal"/>     
    <sdef n="qst"     c="Question word"/>     
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>     
    <sdef n="cnjsub"  c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>     
    <sdef n="cnjadv"  c="Conjunctive adverb"/>     
    <sdef n="vblex"   c="Verb"/>      
    <sdef n="vbhaver" c="Verb 'to exist'"/>      
    <sdef n="vbcop"   c="Copula"/>      
    <sdef n="hab"   c="Habitual"/>   
    <sdef n="tv"      c="Transitive"/>     
    <sdef n="iv"      c="Intransitive"/>      
    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine"/>     
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine"/>     
    <sdef n="mf"      c="Masculine, feminine"/>      
    <sdef n="p1"      c="First person"/>     
    <sdef n="p2"      c="Second person"/>     
    <sdef n="p3"      c="Third person"/>      
    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>     
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>     
    <sdef n="sp"      c="Singular, plural"/>      
    <sdef n="def"     c="Definite"/>     
    <sdef n="ind"     c="Indefinite"/>     
    <sdef n="dem"     c="Demonstrative"/>     
    <sdef n="qnt"     c="Demonstrative"/>     
    <sdef n="pers"    c="Personal"/>     
    <sdef n="ref"     c="Reflexive"/>     
    <sdef n="rel"     c="Relative"/>     
    <sdef n="emph"    c="Emphatic"/>      
    <sdef n="pst"     c="Positive"/>     
    <sdef n="comp"    c="Comparative"/>     
    <sdef n="sup"     c="Superlative"/>      
    <sdef n="nom"     c="Nominative (Absolutive)"/>     
    <sdef n="obl"     c="Oblique (Ergative)"/>     
    <sdef n="con"     c="Construct"/>     
    <sdef n="voc"     c="Vocative"/>      
    <sdef n="top"     c="Toponym"/>      
    <sdef n="al"     c="Altres"/>      
    <sdef n="ant"     c="Anthroponym"/>      
    <sdef n="pri"    c="Present"/>     
    <sdef n="past"    c=""/>     
    <sdef n="perf"    c=""/>     
    <sdef n="prog"    c=""/> 
    <sdef n="fpi"    c=""/> 
    <sdef n="imp"    c=""/>     
    <sdef n="inf"    c=""/>   
    <sdef n="itg"      c="Interrogative"/>  
    <sdef n="pp"    c=""/>     
    <sdef n="prs"    c=""/>     
    <sdef n="fut"     c="Future"/>     
    <sdef n="plu"     c=""/>     
    <sdef n="neg"     c="Negative"/>      
    <sdef n="org"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="sym"     c="Symbol"/>      
    <sdef n="barb"     c="Barbarisme"/>      
    <sdef n="sent" 	c="Sentence marker"/>
    <sdef n="lpar" 	c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar" 	c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot" 	c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot" 	c="Right quote"/>
    <sdef n="quot"      c="Quote"/>
    <sdef n="guio" 	c="Hyphen"/>    
    <sdef n="cm"   	c="Comma"/>    
    <sdef n="vaux"   	c="Auxiliary verb"/>    
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
      
<!-- SECTION: Preadverbs  -->

    <pardef n="gelek__preadv">
	    <e><p><l/><r><s n="preadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

<!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+'?</re><p><l>an</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+'?</re><p><l>yan</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+'?</re><p><l>î</l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+'?</re><p><l>ê</l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+'?</re><p><l>yê</l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+'?</re><p><l>a</l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<!-- FIX ME: grammatical info -->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[\?;:…]</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[.!]+</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="guio">
      <e><re>[—\-]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>–</l><r>–<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
<!--    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.\?;:!…"]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> -->
  
    <pardef n="quotes">
      <e><re>[«“]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[»”]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="symbols">
      <e><re>[αβγδεζηθικλμνξοπρσςτυφχψω]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sym"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="barbarismes">
      <e><re>[اأإآبتثجحخدذرزسشصضطظعغفقكلمنهويىءؤئةە]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="barb"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[а-яё]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="barb"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[αβγδεζηθικλμνξοπρσςτυφχψω]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="barb"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Enclitics -->

    <pardef n="ma__qst">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="qst"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dê__fut">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="jî__enc">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/yê__enc">
      <e><p><l>yê</l><r>yê<s n="con"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ya</l><r>yê<s n="con"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yên</l><r>yê<s n="con"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ê</l><r>yê<s n="con"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r>yê<s n="con"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ên</l><r>yê<s n="con"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adpositions -->
    <pardef n="ba__pr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/bi__pr">
      <e><p><l>bi</l><r>bi<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pê</l><r>bi<s n="pr"/><j/>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pê</l><r>bi<s n="pr"/><j/>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/di__pr">
      <e><p><l>di</l><r>di<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tê</l><r>di<s n="pr"/><j/>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tê</l><r>di<s n="pr"/><j/>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ji__pr">
      <e><p><l>ji</l><r>ji<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jê</l><r>ji<s n="pr"/><j/>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jê</l><r>ji<s n="pr"/><j/>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jê</l><r>ji<s n="pr"/><j/>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

    <e lm="yê"><i/><par n="/yê__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="jî"><i>jî</i><par n="jî__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="ma"><i>ma</i><par n="ma__qst"/></e>
    <e lm="gelo"><i>gelo</i><par n="ma__qst"/></e>
    <e lm="dê"><i>dê</i><par n="dê__fut"/></e>
    <e lm="ji bona ku"><i>ji<b/>bona<b/>ku</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="derheqa"><i>derheqa</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="derheqê"><i>derheqê</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="digel"><i>digel</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="qasî"><i>qasî</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="bi qasî"><i>bi<b/>qasî</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="derbarê"><i>derbarê</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="navbera"><i>navbera</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="wek"><i>wek</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="wekî"><i>wekî</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="wekî"><p><l>weku</l><r>wekî</r></p><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="weke"><i>weke</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="hember"><i>hember</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ji"><i/><par n="/ji__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="bi"><i/><par n="/bi__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="di"><i/><par n="/di__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="de"><i>de</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="bo"><i>bo</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ba"><i>ba</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ber"><i>ber</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="bêî"><i>bêî</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="berî"><i>berî</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="bêyî"><i>bêyî</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="bêy"><i>bêy</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="bi tenê"><i>bi<b/>tenê</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="bi xêra"><i>bi<b/>xêra</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="derveyî"><i>derveyî</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ji bilî"><i>ji<b/>bilî</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ji bo"><i>ji<b/>bo</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ji bona"><i>ji<b/>bona</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="li ser"><i>li<b/>ser</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ji bo" r="LR"><p><l>jibo</l><r>ji<b/>bo</r></p><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ji bo" r="LR"><p><l>jî<b/>bo</l><r>ji<b/>bo</r></p><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ji nava"><i>ji<b/>nava</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ji xeynî"><i>ji<b/>xeynî</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="li cem"><i>li<b/>cem</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="li ber"><i>li<b/>ber</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="li dijî"><i>li<b/>dijî</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="li dora"><i>li<b/>dora</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ligel"><i>ligel</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pişta"><i>pişta</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="piştî"><i>piştî</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="heta"><i>heta</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="heya"><i>heya</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="gelek"><i>gelek</i><par n="gelek__preadv"/></e>
      <e><par n="coma"/></e>
      <e><par n="separa"/></e>
      <e><par n="guio"/></e>
      <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
      <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
      <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
      <e><par n="quotes"/></e>
      <e><par n="symbols"/></e>
      <e><par n="barbarismes"/></e>
